Utah statutes.
26-23b-106.   Medical laboratory reporting requirements.

(1)  Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection 26-23b-103(1), the director of a medical laboratory located in this state is responsible for reporting results of a laboratory test that confirm a condition or illness described in Subsection 26-23b-103(1) within 24 hours after obtaining the results of the test.  This reporting requirement also applies to results obtained on specimens sent to an out-of-state laboratory for analysis.

(2)  The director of a medical laboratory located outside this state that receives a specimen obtained inside this state is responsible for reporting the results of any test that confirm a condition or illness described in Subsection 26-23b-103(1), within 24 hours of obtaining the results, provided that the laboratory that performs the test has agreed to the reporting requirements of this state.

(3)  If a medical laboratory is part of a health care facility subject to the reporting requirements of this chapter, the director of the medical laboratory shall make the report required by this section on behalf of the health care facility.

(4)  The report required by this section shall be submitted in accordance with Subsection 26-23b-103(2).

(5)  The director of a medical laboratory is subject to the penalties of Subsection 26-23b-103(3) for failing to make a report required by this section.

